District of Columbia statutes.
22-2712

Operating house of prostitution.

Any person who, within the District of Columbia, knowingly, shall accept, receive, levy, or appropriate any money or other valuable thing, without consideration other than the furnishing of a place for prostitution or the servicing of a place for prostitution, from the proceeds or earnings of any individual engaged in prostitution shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 5 years and by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

June 25, 1910, 36 Stat. 833, ch. 404, § 8
as added Jan. 3, 1941, 54 Stat. 1226, ch. 936, § 4
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 12(f), 41 DCR 1639
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 229(f), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-2712.
1973 Ed., § 22-2712.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 229(f) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.